Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.330.200

Organization of board—Assumption of superintendent's duties by board member, when.

The term of office of directors of districts of the second class shall begin, and the board shall organize, as provided in *RCW 28A.315.500. At the first meeting of the members of the board they shall elect a chair from among their number who shall serve for a term of one year or until his or her successor is elected. The school district superintendent as defined in RCW 28A.150.080 shall serve as secretary to the board. Whenever a district shall be without the services of such a superintendent and the business of the district necessitates action thereby, the board shall appoint any member thereof to carry out the superintendent's powers and duties for the district.

[ 1990 c 33 s 349; 1988 c 187 s 2; 1975 c 43 s 14; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.60.010. Prior: 1953 c 111 s 1; prior: (i) 1909 c 97 p 298 s 5; RRS s 4815. (ii) 1909 c 97 p 301 s 5; RRS s 4827. Formerly RCW 28A.60.010, 28.63.010.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 28A.315.500 was recodified as RCW 28A.343.360 pursuant to 1999 c 315 s 804.

Effective date—Severability—1975 c 43: See notes following RCW 28A.535.050.